Utah statutes.
17D-1-211.   Municipality's ability to provide temporary jail facilities not affected by the creation of a special service district to provide jail services.

The creation of a special service district to provide jail services as provided in Subsection 17D-1-201(10) does not affect the ability of a municipality under Section 10-8-58 to provide, operate, and maintain facilities for the temporary incarceration, not to exceed 72 hours, of persons charged with the violation of a municipal ordinance.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

